District of Columbia statutes.
44-301.06a

Appeals of rescissions to the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

If an insurer denies a member or member representative’s appeal of a rescission, the insurer shall provide the member or member representative and the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking with a written explanation of why the insurer found that there was fraud or misrepresentation of a material fact. The notice shall explain the member’s right to appeal to the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

History

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-274, § 106a
as added Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-229, § 2(f), 59 DCR 13592

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-229 added this section.